Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-389
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Homicide of the Unborn Child Act, unless the context otherwise requires:

(1) Premeditation means a design formed to do something before it is done; and

(2) Unborn child means an individual member of the species Homo sapiens, at any stage of development in utero, who was alive at the time of the homicidal act and died as a result thereof whether before, during, or after birth.

Laws 2002, LB 824, § 3.